District of Columbia statutes.
29-1005.01

Members.

To begin business, a limited cooperative association shall have at least 2 patron members unless the sole member is a cooperative.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 501 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.